New Jersey, session 222, S3965.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  P.L.2025, c.283 is repealed. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This bill repeals P.L.2025, c.283, which requires health insurers (health, hospital and medical service corporations, commercial individual and group health insurers, health maintenance organizations; health benefits plans issued pursuant to the New Jersey Individual Health Coverage and Small Employer Health Benefits Programs, the State Health Benefits Program, and the School Employees Health Benefits Program) and the State Medicaid Program to provide coverage, without requiring any cost sharing, for expenses incurred in the provision of immunizations that have in effect a recommendation from the New Jersey Department of Health.  P.L.2025, c.283 requires the department, in making its recommendations, to consider the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in the federal Department of Health and Human Services and, as appropriate, the recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, and the American College of Physicians. P.L.2025, c.283 revised certain references to Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices in statutory and regulatory law.  Specifically, the law replaced references to Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices recommendations concerning vaccinations and immunizations with references to the recommendations of the Department of Health.